Utah statutes.
63G-15-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Government entity" means the state and its political subdivisions as both are defined in this section.

(2)  "Political subdivision" is as defined in Section 63G-7-102.

(3)  "State":

(a)  means the state of Utah;

(b)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), includes each office, department, division, agency, authority, commission, board, institution, hospital, college, university, or other instrumentality of the state; and

(c)  does not include the State Tax Commission.

